Utah statutes.
9-7-410.   Consolidation with county library.

(1)  If a city library consolidates with a county library, the city library board of directors shall convey all assets and, except as provided in Subsection (2), trust funds to the county library board of directors, and the city library shall cease operation.

(2)  If a conveyance of trust funds under Subsection (1) would constitute a violation of the trust agreement governing the trust funds, conveyance of those funds is not required, and those funds may continue to be used in accordance with the trust agreement for any library facility specified in the trust agreement, even after the facility becomes a county library facility because of consolidation.

